Chapter 23 From Roosevelt to Wilson in the Age of Progressivism


The Republicans Split
 On a sunny spring morning in 1909, Theodore Roosevelt, wearing the greatcoat of a colonel of the Rough Riders, left New York for a safari in Africa. An ex-president at the age of 50, he had turned over the White House to his chosen successor, William Howard Taft, and was now off for “the joy of wandering through lonely lands, the joy of hunting the mighty and terrible lords” of Africa, “where death broods in the dark and silent depths.” Some of Roosevelt’s enemies hoped he would not return. “I trust some lion will do its duty,” Wall Street magnate J. P. Morgan said. Always prepared, Roosevelt took nine extra pairs of eyeglasses, and, just in case, several expert hunters accompanied him. When the nearsighted Roosevelt took aim, three others aimed at the same moment. “Mr. Roosevelt had a fairly good idea of the general direction,” the safari leader said, “but we couldn’t take chances with the life of a former president.” Though he had built a reputation as an ardent conservationist, Roosevelt shot nine lions, five elephants, thirteen rhinoceroses, seven hippopotamuses, and assorted other game—acquiring nearly three hundred trophies in all. It was all good fun, and afterward Roosevelt set off on a tour of Europe. He attended the funeral of the king of England with the crowned heads of Europe, dined with

 the king and queen of Italy—an experience he likened to “a Jewish wedding on the East Side of New York”—and happily spent five hours reviewing troops of the German empire. Less happily, he followed events back home where, in the judgment of many friends, Taft was not working out as president. Gifford Pinchot, Roosevelt’s close companion in the conservation movement, came to Italy to complain personally about Taft, and at almost every stop there were letters waiting for him from other disappointed Republicans. For his part, Taft was puzzled by it all. Honest and warmhearted, he had intended to continue Roosevelt’s policies, even writing Roosevelt that he would “see to it that your judgment in selecting me as your successor and bringing about that succession shall be vindicated.” But events turned out differently. The conservative and progressive wings of the Republican party split, and Taft often sided with the conservatives. Among progressive Republicans, Taft’s troubles stirred talk of a Roosevelt “back from Elba” movement, akin to Napoleon’s return from exile. Thousands gathered to greet Roosevelt on his return from Europe. He sailed into New York harbor on June 18, 1910, to the sound of naval guns and loud cheers.

 A 1910 Puck cartoon shows Taft snarled in the intricacies of office as his disappointed mentor looks on.

 In characteristic fashion, he had helped make the arrangements: “If there is to be a great crowd, do arrange it so that the whole crowd has a chance to see me and that there is as little disappointment as possible.” Greeting Pinchot, one of Taft’s leading opponents, with a hearty “Hello, Gifford,” Roosevelt slipped away to his home in Oyster Bay, New York, where other friends awaited him. He carried with him a touching letter from Taft, received just before he left Europe. “I have had a hard time—I do not know that I have had harder luck than other Presidents, but I do know that thus far I have succeeded far less than have others. I have been conscientiously trying to carry out your policies but my method of doing so has not worked smoothly.” Taft invited Teddy to spend a night or two at the White House, but Roosevelt declined, saying that ex-presidents should not visit Washington. Relations between the two friends cooled. “It is hard, very hard,” Taft said in 1911, “to see a devoted friendship going to pieces like a rope of sand.”

 new party, the Progressive (or “Bull Moose”) party, to unseat Taft and capture the White House. With Taft, Roosevelt, Woodrow Wilson (the Democratic party’s candidate), and Socialist party candidate Eugene V. Debs all in the race, the election of 1912 became one of the most exciting in American history. It was also one of the most important. People were worried about the social and economic effects of urban-industrial growth. The election of 1912 provided a forum for those worries, and, to a degree unusual in American politics, it pitted deeply opposed candidates against one another and outlined differing views of the nation’s future. In the spirited battle between Roosevelt and Wilson, it also brought to the forefront some of the currents of progressive reform. Those currents built on a number of important developments, including the rise of a new professional class, reform movements designed to cure problems in the cities and states, and the activist, achievement-oriented administrations of Roosevelt and Wilson. Together they produced the age of progressivism.

 year later, there was no longer thought of friendship, only a desperate fight between Taft and Roosevelt for the Republican presidential nomination. Taft won the nomination, but, angry and ambitious, Roosevelt bolted and helped form a

 In one way or another, progressivism touched all aspects of society. Politically, it fostered a reform movement that sought cures for the problems of city, state, and nation. Intellectually, it drew on the expertise of the new social sciences and reflected a

A


The Spirit of Progressivism
 What were the six major characteristics of progressivism?



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 shift from older absolutes such as religion to newer schools of thought that emphasized relativism and the role of the environment in human development. Culturally, it inspired fresh modes of expression in dance, film, painting, literature, and architecture. Touching individuals in different ways, progressivism became a set of attitudes as well as a definable movement. Though broad and diverse, progressivism as a whole had a half dozen characteristics that gave it definition. First, the progressives acted out of concern about the effects of industrialization and the conditions of industrial life. While their viewpoints varied, they did not, as a rule, set out to harm big business, but instead sought to humanize and regulate it. In pursuing these objectives, the progressives displayed a second characteristic: a fundamental optimism about human nature, the possibilities of progress, and the capacity of people to recognize problems and take action to solve them. Progressives believed they could “investigate, educate, and legislate”—learn about a problem, inform people about it, and, with the help of an informed public, find and enforce a solution. Third, more than many earlier reformers, the progressives were willing to intervene in people’s lives, confident that it was their right to do so. They knew best, some of them thought, and as a result, there was an element of coercion in a number of their ideas. Fourth, while progressives preferred if possible to use voluntary means to achieve reform, they tended to turn more and more to the authority of the state and government at all levels in order to put into effect the reforms they wanted. As a fifth characteristic, many progressives drew on a combination of evangelical Protestantism (which gave them the desire— and, they thought, the duty—to purge the world of sins such as prostitution and drunkenness) and the natural and social sciences (whose theories made them confident that they could understand and control the environment in which people lived). Progressives tended to view the environment as a key to reform, thinking—in the way some economists, sociologists, and other social scientists were suggesting—that if they could change the environment, they could change the individual. Finally, progressivism was distinctive because it touched virtually the whole nation. Not everyone, of course, was a progressive, and there were many who opposed or ignored the ideas of the movement. There were also those who were untouched by progressive reforms and those whom the movement overlooked. But in one way or another, a remarkable number of people were caught up in it, giving progressivism a national reach and a mass base. That was one of the features, in fact, that set it off from populism, which had grown mostly in the rural South and West. Progressivism drew support from across society. “The thing that constantly amazed me,” said William Allen White, a leading progressive journalist, “was how many people were with us.” Progressivism appealed to the expanding middle class, prosperous farmers, and skilled laborers; it also attracted significant support in the business community. The progressives believed in progress and disliked waste. No single issue or concern united them all. Some progressives wanted to clean up city governments, others to clean up city streets. Some wanted to purify politics or control corporate abuses, others to eradicate poverty or prostitution. Some demanded social justice in the form of women’s rights, child labor laws, temperance, and factory safety. They were Democrats, Republicans, Socialists, and independents.

Read the Document


 Lincoln Steffens, from The Shame of the Cities (1904)

 Lincoln Steffens was among the best known of the muckraking journalists. His famous book The Shame of the Cities was a collection of articles on municipal corruption that he wrote for McClure's Magazine in 1902 and 1903. In his articles, he reflected the disgust that reformers felt for political machines and their methods.

 Progressives believed in a better world and in the ability of people to achieve it. They paid to people, as a friend said of social reformer Florence Kelley, “the high compliment of believing that, once they knew the truth, they would act upon it.” Progress depended on knowledge. The progressives emphasized individual morality and collective action, the scientific method, and the value of expert opinion. Like contemporary business leaders, they valued system, planning, management, and predictability. They wanted not only reform but efficiency. In the introduction to The Shame of the Cities, Steffens said that the cure for American ills lay in “good conduct in the individual, simple honesty, courage, and efficiency.” Historians once viewed progressivism as the triumph of one group in society over another. In this view, farmers took on the hated and powerful railroads; upstart reformers challenged the city bosses; business interests fought for favorable legislation; youthful professionals carved out their place in society. Now,

The Spirit of Progressivism


 historians emphasize the way progressivism brought people together rather than drove them apart. Disparate groups united in an effort to improve the well-being of many groups in society.

The Rise of the Professions
 Progressivism fed on an organizational impulse that encouraged people to join forces, share information, and solve problems. Between 1890 and 1920, a host of national societies and associations took shape—nearly four hundred of them in just three decades. Groups such as the National Child Labor Committee, which lobbied for legislation to regulate the employment and working conditions of children, were formed to attack specific issues. Other groups reflected one of the most significant developments in American society at the turn of the century—the rise of the professions. Growing rapidly in these years, the professions—law, medicine, religion, business, teaching, and social work—were the source of much of the leadership of the progressive movement. The professions attracted young, educated men and women, who in turn were part of a larger trend: a dramatic increase in the number of individuals working in administrative and professional jobs. In businesses, these people were managers, architects, technicians, and accountants. In city governments, they were experts in everything from education to sanitation. They organized and ran the urban-industrial society. These professionals formed part of a new middle class whose members did not derive their status from birth or inherited wealth, as had many members of the older middle class. Instead, they moved ahead through education and personal accomplishment and worked to become doctors, lawyers, ministers, and teachers. Proud of their skills, they were ambitious and self-confident, and they thought of themselves as experts who could use their knowledge for the benefit of society. (See the Feature Essay, “Madam C. J. Walker: African American Business Pioneer,” pp. 556–557.) As a way of asserting their status, they formed professional societies to look after their interests and govern entry into their professions. Just a few years before, for example, a doctor had become a doctor simply by stocking up on patent medicines and hanging out a sign. Now doctors began to insist they were part of a medical profession, and they wanted to set educational requirements and minimum standards for practice. In 1901, they reorganized the American Medical Association (AMA) and made it into a modern national professional society. The AMA had 8,400 members that year. A decade later, it had more than 70,000, and by 1920, nearly two-thirds of all doctors belonged. Other groups and professions showed the same pattern. Lawyers formed bar associations, created examining boards, and lobbied for regulations restricting entry into the profession. Teachers organized the National Education Association (1905) and pressed for teacher certification and compulsory education laws. Social workers formed the National Federation of Settlements (1911); business leaders created the National Association of Manufacturers (1895) and the U.S. Chamber of Commerce (1912); and farmers joined the National Farm Bureau Federation to spread information about farming and to try to improve their lot. Working both as individuals and groups, members of the professions had a major effect on the era, as the career of one of them, Dr. Alice Hamilton, illustrated. Hamilton early decided to devote her life to helping the less fortunate. Choosing medicine, she went



 to the University of Michigan Medical School, one of a shrinking number of medical schools that admitted women, and then settled in Chicago, where she met Jane Addams and took a room in Hull House. Soon thereafter, she traced a local typhoid epidemic to flies carrying germs from open privies. The study won national acclaim, but Hamilton had already turned her attention to the work-related illnesses she found everywhere around Hull House. Combining field study with meticulous laboratory techniques, she pioneered research into the causes of lead poisoning and other industrial disease. In 1908, the governor of Illinois appointed her to a commission on occupational diseases; two years later, she headed a statewide survey of industrial poisons. Thanks to her work, in 1911, Illinois passed the first state law providing compensation for industrial disease caused by poisonous fumes and dust. By the end of the 1930s, all the major industrial states had such laws. One of the new professionals, Hamilton had used her education and skill to broaden knowledge of her subject, change industrial practices, and improve the lives of countless workers. “For me,” she said later in a comment characteristic of the progressives, “the satisfaction is that things are better now, and I had some part in it.”

The Social-Justice Movement
 As Alice Hamilton’s career exemplified, progressivism began in the cities during the 1890s. It first took form around settlement workers and others interested in freeing individuals from the crushing impact of cities and factories. Ministers, intellectuals, social workers, and lawyers joined in a social-justice movement that focused national attention on the need for tenement house laws, more stringent child labor legislation, and better working conditions for women. They brought pressure on municipal agencies for more and better parks, playgrounds, day nurseries, schools, and community services. Blending private and public action, settlement leaders turned increasingly to government aid. “Private beneficence,” Jane Addams said, “is totally inadequate to deal with the vast numbers of the city’s disinherited.” Social-justice reformers were more interested in social cures than individual charity. Unlike earlier reformers, they saw problems as endless and interrelated; individuals became part of a city’s larger patterns. With that insight, social-service casework shifted from a focus on an individual’s well-being to a scientific analysis of neighborhoods, occupations, and classes. In the spring of 1900, the Charity Organization Society of New York held a tenement house exhibition that graphically presented the new kind of sociological data. Put together by Lawrence Veiller, a young social worker, the exhibition included more than a thousand photographs, detailed maps of slum districts, statistical tables and charts, and graphic cardboard depictions of tenement blocks. Never before had so much information been pulled together in one place. Veiller correlated data on poverty and disease with housing conditions, and he pointed out that new slums were springing up in more areas of the city. Stirred by the public outcry, Governor Theodore Roosevelt appointed the New York State Tenement House Commission to do something about the problem. With Veiller’s success as a model, study after study analyzed the condition of the poor. Books and pamphlets such as The Standard of Living Among Working Men’s Families in New York City (1909) contained pages of data on family budgets, women’s wages and working



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 conditions, child labor, and other matters. Between 1910 and 1913, the U.S. Commissioner of Labor issued a massive nineteen-volume report on Conditions of Women and Children Wage-Earners in the United States. Social-justice reformers, banding together to work for change, formed the National Conference of Charities and Corrections, which in 1915 became the National Conference of Social Work. Controlled by social workers, the conference reflected the growing professionalization of reform. Through it, social workers discovered each other’s efforts, shared methodology, and tried to establish themselves as a separate field within the social sciences. Once content with informal training sessions in a settlement house living room, they now founded complete professional schools at Chicago, Harvard, and other universities. After 1909, they had their own professional magazine, the Survey, and instead of piecemeal reforms, they aimed at a comprehensive program of minimum wages, maximum hours, workers’ compensation, and widows’ pensions.

 than at any other time until the 1960s. Some working-class women pushed for higher wages and better working conditions. Collegeeducated women—five thousand a year graduated after 1900—took up careers in the professions, from which some of them supported reform. From 1890 to 1910, the work of a number of national women’s organizations, including the National Council of Jewish Women, the National Congress of Mothers, and the Women’s Trade Union League, furthered the aims of the progressive movement. Excluded from most of these organizations, African American women formed their own groups. The National Association of

Read the Document


Report of the Vice


Commission (1915)


The Purity Crusade
 Working in city neighborhoods, social-justice reformers were often struck by the degree to which alcohol affected the lives of the people they were trying to help. Workers drank away their wages; some men spent more time at the saloon than at home. Drunkenness caused violence, and it angered employers who did not want intoxicated workers on the job. In countless ways, alcohol wasted human resources, the reformers believed, and along with business leaders, ministers, and others, they launched a crusade to remove the evils of drink from American life. At the head of the crusade was the Women’s Christian Temperance Union (WCTU), which had continued to grow since it was founded in the 1870s. By 1911, the WCTU had nearly a quarter of a million members; it was the largest organization of women in American history to that time. In 1893, it was joined by the Anti-Saloon League, and together the groups pressed to abolish alcohol and the places where it was consumed. By 1916, they had succeeded in nineteen states, but as drinking continued elsewhere, they pushed for a nationwide law. In the midst of the moral fervor of World War I, they succeeded, and the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution, prohibiting the manufacture, sale, and transportation of intoxicating liquors, took effect in January 1920. The amendment encountered troubles later in the 1920s as the social atmosphere changed, but at the time it passed, progressives thought Prohibition was a major step toward eliminating social instability and moral wrong. In a similar fashion, some progressive reformers also worked to get rid of prostitution, convinced that poverty and ignorance drove women to the trade. By 1915, nearly every state had banned brothels, and in 1910, Congress passed the Mann Act, which prohibited the interstate transportation of women for immoral purposes. Like the campaign against liquor, the campaign against prostitution reflected the era’s desire to purify and elevate, often through the instrument of government action.

 Woman Suffrage, Women’s Rights Women played a large role in the social-justice movement. Feminists were particularly active, especially in the political sphere, between 1890 and 1914—feminists were more active then, in fact,

 During the first two decades of the twentieth century, Progressive reformers set out to improve society. One strategy they employed was eradicating vice. Termed vice crusaders, these reformers attempted to stamp out prostitution, especially in large cities, as well as homosexuality. The pinnacle of the anti-vice movement was the passage of the Mann Act of 1910, which made it illegal to transport women across state lines for “immoral purposes.”



The Spirit of Progressivism


View the Map


“Changing Lives of American Women, 1880–1930”


 CANADA 1916, Helena, MT. Jeanette Rankin is elected the first woman to the U.S. House of Representatives.

 WASHINGTON (1910)

Columbia


R.


 MONTANA (1914)

NORTH DAKOTA

 ke Superior La

 MINNESOTA

1908, Salem, OR. Miller v. State of Oregon
U.S.
Supreme Court upholds Oregon’s 10 hour work day for women. 
.


 do

R.


KANSAS KA ANSAS
(1912) (1 1912) 
Arkan
 sa

C


 INDIANA

O


 MISSOURI

 *DELAWARE

WEST VIRGINIA

.


 *MARYLAND *VIRGINIA

PACIFIC OCEAN

Red R.


 ARKANSAS

1892, Memphis, TN. Journalist
 Ida B. Wells launches an anti-lynching campaign.

 *MISSISSIPPI *ALABAMA

Bra


 *SOUTH CAROLINA



 sR .



400 mi


400 km


 1839, Jackson, MS. First married women’s property act passed granting married women ownership over limited property.

Rio
 an

Gr


4.24


 de

NUMBER OF CHILDREN
(per woman) 


 *FLORIDA

 *LOUISIANA

FERTILITY RATE BY RACE

ATLANTIC OCEAN

 *GEORGIA

 zo

 TEXAS

 *NORTH CAROLINA

 TENNESSEE

 siss Mis

Rio Grand
 e

 OKLAHOMA (1918)

 ippi

NEW MEXICO

R.


 KENTUCKY 1932, Little Rock, AR. Hattie Wyatt Caraway is the first woman elected to the U.S. Senate.

 ARIZONA (1912)

 Non-white



 MEXICO

GULF OF MEXICO

3.56


3.87
3.56


3.42


2.73


3.22


2.62


2.51
2.18


White


1916, Brooklyn, NY.
Margaret Sanger
 opens first U.S. birth control clinic.

 OHIO

R
 hio

 s R.

 CALIFORNIA (1911)



 NJ

 PENNSYLVANIA 1889, 889, Ch Chicago, IL. Jane Addams establishes establi ablishe Hull House.

 COLORADO (1893)

 ra

 o ol

 property act passed granting married women legal right to own property in their own name.

IOWA IO

 1894, Denver, CO. First U.S. women omen me elected to State House of Representatives. esentatives. entatives

 UTAH (1870)

R.


 ri R

Lake Michiga


Mis
 sou NEBRASKA

VERMONT NEW NEW HAMPSHIRE YORK
o MICH. Ontari (1917) . L (1918) MASSACHUSETTS CONN RI 1848, Albany, NY. Model married women’s uron 
 i ipp

 NEVADA (1914)

SOUTH DAKOTA
(1918) 
 WYOMING (1869)

Great
Salt Lake


Mi
 ss

 eH ak

 IDAHO (1896) R. Snake

 n

L


 WISCONSIN

 iss

 OREGON (1912)

 MAINE

 1848, Seneca Falls, NY. Women gather for convention to organize women’s rights.

PERCENTAGE OF TOTAL WOMEN WORKING BY RACE OR NATIVITY, 1890
Nonwhite 52.37% White 21.5% 
Foreign
 born 26%

1880 1890 1900 1910 1920 1930 1940


PERCENTAGE OF WOMEN WORKING, 1900

Single
89%


Married
11%


PERCENTAGE OF WOMEN IN THE WORKFORCE, 1900
Less than 10% 10–20% 20–30% More than 40% 
 (1918) Date womens’ suffrage legislation was passed * States which never ratified the 19th amendment in 1920

 Wyoming was the first of several western states to grant women the right to vote; however, in most eastern states women's suffrage came only with the passage of the Nineteenth Amendment in 1920. The number of women in the workforce grew steadily to 18 percent by 1900, a figure that reflects an emphasis on industrial workers and ignores workers more informally employed in agricultural and domestic occupations.

 Colored Women was founded in 1895, fourteen years before the better known male-oriented National Association for the Advancement of Colored People (NAACP). Aimed at social welfare, the women’s organization was the first African American social-service agency in the country. At the local level, African American women’s clubs established kindergartens, day nurseries, playgrounds, and retirement homes. From two hundred thousand members in 1900, the General Federation of Women’s Clubs grew to more than one million by 1912. The clubs met, as they had before, for coffee and literary conversation, but they also began to look closely at conditions around them. Forming an Industrial Section and a Committee on

 Legislation for Women and Children, the federation supported reforms to safeguard child and women workers, improve schools, ensure pure food, and beautify the community. Reluctant at first, the federation finally lent support in 1914 to woman suffrage, a cause that dated back to the first women’s rights convention in Seneca Falls, New York, in 1848. Divided over tactics since the Civil War, the suffrage movement suffered from disunity, male opposition, indecision over whether to seek action at the state or at the national level, resistance from the Catholic Church, and opposition from liquor interests, who linked the cause to Prohibition. Women in the social-justice movement needed to influence elected officials—most of them men, whom they could not reach



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 laws to protect workers, and other reforms. This argument attracted Read the Document National American Woman Suffrage Association, many progressives who believed Mother’s Day Letter the women’s vote would purify politics. In 1918, the House passed a constitutional amendment stating simply that the right to vote shall not be denied “on account of sex.” The Senate and enough states followed, and, after three generations of suffragist efforts, the Nineteenth Amendment took effect in 1920. The social justice movement had the most success in passing state laws limiting the working hours of women. By 1913, thirty-nine states set maximum working hours for women or banned the employment of women at night. Illinois had a ten-hour law; California and Washington had eight-hour laws. Wisconsin, Oregon, and Kansas allowed expert commissions to set different hours depending on the degree of strain in various occupations. As early as 1900, thanks to groups such as the National Child Labor Committee, twenty-eight states had laws regulating child The National American Woman Suffrage Association (NAWSA) was formed in 1890 from the merger of labor. But the courts often ruled two organizations founded by Elizabeth Cady Stanton and Susan B. Anthony, respectively, in 1869. Under against such laws, and families— the leadership of Carrie Chapman Catt, membership in the organization rose to 2 million. Catt's organization needing extra income—sometimes was relatively mainstream, especially in contrast to the militant National Woman's Party, which adopted ignored them. Parents sent children radical tactics including hunger strikes, demonstrations, and pickets. off to jobs with orders to lie about their ages. through the vote. Because politics was an avenue for reform, growing In 1916, President Woodrow Wilson backed a law to limit child numbers of women activists became involved in the suffrage movelabor, the Keating-Owen Act, but in Hammer v. Dagenhart (1918), ment. After years of disagreement, the two major suffrage organizathe Supreme Court overturned it as an improper regulation of local tions, the National Woman Suffrage Association and the American labor conditions. In 1919, Congress tried again in the Second Child Woman Suffrage Association, merged in 1890 to form the National Labor Act, but in Bailey v. Drexel Furniture Company (1922) the legAmerican Woman Suffrage Association. The merger opened a islation was again struck down. Not until the 1930s did Congress new phase of the suffrage movement, characterized by unity and a succeed in passing a court-supported national child labor law. tightly controlled national organization. In 1900, Carrie Chapman Catt, a superb organizer, became A Ferment of Ideas: Challenging president of the National American Woman Suffrage Association, the Status Quo which by 1920 had nearly two million members. Catt and Anna Howard Shaw, who became the association’s head in 1904, believed A dramatic shift in ideas became one of the most important forces in organization and peaceful lobbying to win the vote. Alice Paul behind progressive reform. Most of the ideas focused on the role of and Lucy Burns, founders of the Congressional Union, were more the environment in shaping human behavior. Progressive reformmilitant; they interrupted public meetings, focused on Congress ers accepted society’s growing complexity, called for factual treatrather than the states, and in 1917 picketed the White House. ment of piecemeal problems, allowed room for new theories, and, Significantly, Catt, Paul, and others made a major change in above all, rejected age-encrusted divine or natural “laws” in favor the argument for woman suffrage. When the campaign began in of thoughts and actions that worked. the nineteenth century, suffragists had claimed the vote as a natA new doctrine called pragmatism emerged in this ferment ural right, owed to women as much as men. Now, they emphaof ideas. It came from William James, a brilliant Harvard psycholosized a pragmatic argument: Since women were more sensitive to gist who became the key figure in American thought from the 1890s moral issues than men, they would use their votes to help create a to World War I. A warm, tolerant person, James was impatient with better society. They would support temperance, clean government, theories that regarded truth as abstract. Truth, he believed, should

The Spirit of Progressivism




 Rejecting the older view of the law as universal and unchanging, lawyers and legal theorists instead viewed Read the Document Eugene V. Debs, from “The Outlook for it as a reflection of the environment—an instrument Socialism in America” (1900) for social change. Law reflected the environment that shaped it. A movement grew among judges for “sociological jurisprudence” that related the law to social reform instead of only to legal precedent, a shift most evident in the famed Brandeis brief, presented in the case of Muller v. Oregon that came before the Supreme Court in 1908. In Denver, Colorado, after Judge Ben Lindsey sentenced a boy to reform school for stealing coal, the boy’s mother rushed forward and, grief stricken, beat her head against the wall. Lindsey investigated the case and found that the father was a smelting worker dying of lead poisoning; the family needed coal for heat. From such experiences, Lindsey concluded that children were not born with a genetic tendency to crime; they were made good or bad by the environment in which they grew. Lindsey “sentenced” youthful offenders to education and good care. He worked for playgrounds, slum clearance, public baths, and technical schools. Known as the “Kids’ Judge,” he attracted visitors from as far away as Japan, who Presidential campaign poster for Eugene V. Debs on the Socialist party of America ticket in 1904. wanted to study and copy his methods. The poster’s imagery appeals to industrial workers, miners, and farmers, and its slogan, “Workers Socialism, a reformist political philosophy, grew of the world unite,” was a key call to action of the party to challenge the injustices of capitalism. dramatically before World War I. Socialist political parties, composed of followers of Karl Marx, first work for the individual, and it worked best not in abstraction, but appeared in New York, Chicago, Milwaukee, and other cities after in action. “True ideas are those we can assimilate, validate, corrobothe Civil War. They urged workers to join a worldwide revolution rate, and verify. False ideas are those we cannot.” to overthrow capitalism. Such public appeals, however, drew little People, James thought, not only were shaped by their environsupport. Leaders of a new Socialist Labor Party, founded in 1877, ment; they shaped it. In Pragmatism (1907), he praised “toughtried in secret to gain control of important labor unions. That minded” individuals who could live effectively in a world with strategy also failed. no easy answers. The tough-minded accepted change; they knew Daniel De Leon, a brilliant tactician, took over leadership of how to pick manageable problems, gather facts, discard ideas that the Socialist Labor Party during the 1890s, but he too lacked mass did not work, and act on those that did. Ideas that worked became support. Arguing for a more moderate form of socialism, Eugene truth. “What is the ‘cash value’ of a thought, idea, or belief?” James V. Debs, president of the American Railway Union, in 1896 formed asked. Does it work? Does it make a difference to the individa rival organization, the Social Democratic Party. Gentle and reflecual who experiences it? “The ultimate test for us of what a truth tive, not at all the popular image of the wild-eyed radical, Debs was means,” said James, “is the conduct it dictates.” thrust into prominence by the Pullman strike. In 1901, persuading The most influential educator of the Progressive Era, John opponents of De Leon to join him, he formed the Socialist party of Dewey, applied pragmatism to educational reform. A friend and disAmerica. Neither Debs nor the party ever developed a cohesive platciple of William James, he argued that thought evolves in relation form, nor was Debs an effective organizer. But he was eloquent, pasto the environment and that education is directly related to expesionate, and visionary. An excellent speaker, he captivated audiences, rience. In 1896, Dewey founded a separate School of Pedagogy at attacking the injustices of capitalism and urging a workers’ republic. the University of Chicago, with a laboratory in which educational The Socialist Party of America enlisted some intellectuals, theory based on the newer philosophical and psychological studies factory workers, disillusioned Populists, tenant farmers, miners, could be tested and practiced. and lumberjacks. By 1911, there were Socialist mayors in thirty-two Dewey introduced an educational revolution that emphasized cities, including Berkeley, California; Butte, Montana; and Flint, children’s needs and capabilities. He described his beliefs and methMichigan. Although its doctrines were aimed at an urban proleods in a number of books, notably School and Society (1899) and tariat, the Socialist Party drew support in rural Texas, Missouri, Democracy and Education (1916). New ideas in education, he said, Arkansas, Idaho, and Washington. In Oklahoma, it attracted as are “as much a product of the changed social situation, and as much much as one-third of the vote. an effort to meet the needs of the society that is forming, as are Although torn by factions, the Socialist Party doubled in changes in modes of industry and commerce.” He opposed memomembership between 1904 and 1908, then tripled in the four years rization, rote learning, and dogmatic, authoritarian teaching methafter that. Running for president, Debs garnered 100,000 votes in ods; he emphasized personal growth, free inquiry, and creativity. 1900; 400,000 in 1904; and 900,000 in 1912, the party’s peak year.



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

Reform in the Cities and States
 What methods did progressive reformers use to attack problems in the cities and states? Progressive reformers realized government could be a crucial agent in accomplishing their goals. They wanted to curb the influence of “special interests” and, through such measures of political reform as the direct primary and the direct election of senators, make government follow the public will. Once it did, they welcomed government action at whatever level was appropriate. As a result of this thinking, the use of federal power increased, as did the power and prestige of the presidency. Progressives not only lobbied for government-sponsored reform but also worked actively in their home neighborhoods, cities, and states; much of the significant change occurred in local settings, outside the national limelight. Most important, the progressives believed in the ability of experts to solve problems. At every level—local, state, and federal—thousands of commissions and agencies took form. Staffed by trained experts, they oversaw a multitude of matters ranging from railroad rates to public health.

VOTER PARTICIPATION IN PRESIDENTIAL ELECTIONS, 1876–1920
Percentage 
81.8


79.4


79.3




79.3
73.2


77.5
74.7


65.4
61.6


65.2
58.8


49.2






Interest Groups and the Decline of
Popular Politics
 Placing government in the hands of experts was one way to get it out of the hands of politicians and political parties. The direct primary, which allowed voters rather than parties to choose candidates for office, was another way. These initiatives and others like them were part of a fundamental change in the way Americans viewed their political system. As one sign of the change, fewer and fewer people were going to the polls. Voter turnout dropped dramatically after 1900, when the intense partisanship of the decades after the Civil War gave way to media-oriented political campaigns based largely on the personalities of the candidates. From 1876 to 1900, the average turnout in presidential elections was 77 percent. From 1900 to 1916, it was 65 percent, and in the 1920s, it dropped to 52 percent, close to the average today. Turnout was lowest among young people, immigrants, the poor, and, ironically, the newly enfranchised women. It was particularly low in the South where conservative whites used restrictive election laws to keep blacks and others from the polls. Turnout in the South fell sharply, from an average of 64 percent in the presidential elections of the 1880s to just 20 percent in 1920 and 1924. Although the decline in the North was less sharp, the reasons for it were more complex. By the 1920s, as many as onequarter of all eligible northern voters never cast a ballot. There were numerous causes for the falloff, but among the most important was the fact that people had found another way to achieve some of the objectives they had once assigned to political parties. They had found the “interest group,” a means of action that assumed importance in this era and became a major feature of politics ever after. Professional societies, trade associations, labor organizations, farm lobbies, and scores of other interest groups worked outside the party system to pressure government for things their members wanted. Social workers, women’s clubs, reform groups, and others learned to apply pressure in similar ways, and the result was much of the significant legislation of the Progressive Era.



1876 1880 1884 1888 1892 1896 1900 1904 1908 1912 1916 1920


Reform in the Cities
 During the early years of the twentieth century, urban reform movements, many of them born in the depression of the 1890s, spread across the nation. In 1894, the National Municipal League was organized, and it became the forum for debate over civic reform, changes in the tax laws, and municipal ownership of public utilities. Within a few years, nearly every city had a variety of clubs and organizations directed at improving the quality of city life. In the 1880s, reformers would call an evening conference, pass resolutions, and then go home; after 1900, they formed associations, adopted long-range policies, and hired a staff to achieve them. In the mid-1890s, only Chicago had an urban reform league with a full-time paid executive; within a decade, there were such leagues in every major city. In city after city, reformers reordered municipal government. Tightening controls on corporate activities, they broadened the scope of utility regulation and restricted city franchises. They updated tax assessments, often skewed in favor of corporations, and tried to clean up the electoral machinery. Devoted to efficiency, they developed a trained civil service to oversee planning and operations. The generation of the 1880s also had believed in civil service, but the goal then was mostly negative: to get spoilsmen out and “good” people in. Now the goal was efficiency and, above all, results. In constructing their model governments, urban reformers often turned to recent advances in business management and organization. They emphasized continuity and expertise, a system in which professional experts staffed a government overseen by elected officials. At the top, the elected leader surveyed the breadth of city,

Reform in the Cities and States


 state, or national affairs and defined directions. Below, a corps of experts—trained in the various disciplines of the new society— funneled the definition into specific, scientifically based policies. Reformers created a growing number of regulatory commissions and municipal departments. They hired engineers to oversee utility and water systems, physicians and nurses to improve municipal health, and city planners to oversee park and highway development. They created specialized “academies” to train police and firefighters. Imitated by the state and federal governments, the proliferation of experts and commissions widened the gap between voters and decision makers but dramatically improved the efficiency of government. As cities exploded in size, they freed themselves from the tight controls of state legislatures and began to experiment with their own governments. Struggling to recover from a devastating hurricane in 1900, Galveston, Texas, pioneered the commission form of government: a form of municipal government in which commissions of appointed experts, rather than elected officials, ran the city. Wanting nonpartisan expertise, Staunton, Virginia, was the first to hire a city manager. Other cities followed, and by 1910 more than one hundred cities were using either the commission or manager type of government. In the race for reform, a number of city mayors won national reputations—among them Seth Low in New York City and Hazen S. Pingree in Detroit—working to modernize taxes, clean up politics, lower utility rates, and control the awarding of valuable city franchises. In Toledo, Ohio, Mayor Samuel M. (“Golden Rule”) Jones, a wealthy manufacturer, took billy clubs away from the police; established free kindergartens, playgrounds, and night schools; and improved wages for city workers. In Cleveland, Ohio, Tom L. Johnson demonstrated an innovative approach to city government. A millionaire who had made his fortune manipulating city franchises, Johnson one day read Henry George’s Progress and Poverty and turned to reform. Elected mayor of Cleveland, he served from 1901 to 1909 and collected a group of aggressive and talented young advisers. Frederic C. Howe, Newton D. Baker, and Edward Bemis—all of whom later won national reputations—shaped Johnson’s ideas on taxes, prison reform, utility regulation, and other issues facing the city. Johnson combined shrewdness and showmanship. Believing in an informed citizenry, he held outdoor meetings in huge tents. He used colorful charts to give Cleveland residents a course in utilities and taxation. He cut down on corruption, cut off special privilege, updated taxes, and gave Cleveland a reputation as the country’s best governed city. Finding it difficult to regulate powerful city utilities and keep their costs down, Johnson and mayors in other cities turned more and more to public ownership of gas, electricity, water, and transportation. The idea of “gas and water socialism”—in which cities owned their own gas, electricity, water, and other utilities—spread swiftly. In 1896, fewer than half of American cities owned their own waterworks; by 1915, almost two-thirds did.

Action in the States
 Reformers soon discovered, however, that many problems lay beyond a city’s boundaries, and they turned for action to the state governments. From the 1890s to 1920, reformers worked to stiffen state laws regulating the labor of women and children, to create



 and strengthen commissions to regulate railroads and utilities, to impose corporate and inheritance taxes, to improve mental and penal institutions, and to allocate more funds for state universities, which were viewed as the training ground for the experts and educated citizenry needed for the new society. Maryland passed the first workers’ compensation law in 1902; soon most industrial states had such legislation. After 1900, many states adopted factory inspection laws, and by 1916, almost two-thirds of the states mandated insurance for the victims of factory accidents. By 1914, twenty-five states had enacted employers’ liability laws. To regulate business, virtually every state created regulatory commissions empowered to examine corporate books and hold public hearings. Building on earlier experience, state commissions after 1900 were given new power to initiate actions, rather than await complaints, and in some cases to set maximum prices and rates. Dictating company practices, they pioneered regulatory methods later adopted in federal legislation of 1906 and 1910. Some business leaders supported the federal laws in order to get rid of “the intolerable supervision” of dozens of separate state commissions. Historians have long praised the regulation movement, but the commissions did not always act wisely or even in the public interest. Elective commissions often produced commissioners who had little knowledge of corporate affairs. In addition, to win an election, some promised specific rates or reforms, obligations that might bias the commission’s investigative functions. Appointive commissions sometimes fared better, but they too had to oversee extraordinarily complex businesses such as the railroads. Shaping everything from wages to train schedules, the regulatory commissions affected railroad profits and growth negatively and, in the end, damaged the railroad industry. To the progressives, commissions offered a way to end the corrupt alliance between business and politics. There was another way, too, and that was to “democratize” government by reducing the power of politicians and increasing the influence of the electorate. To do that, progressives backed three measures to make office holders responsive to popular will: the initiative, which allowed voters to propose new laws; the referendum, which allowed them to accept or reject a law at the ballot box; and the recall, which gave them a way to remove an elected official from office. Oregon adopted the initiative and referendum in 1902; by 1912, twelve states had them. That year Congress added the Seventeenth Amendment to the Constitution to provide for the direct election of U.S. senators. By 1916, all but three states had direct primaries, which allowed the people, rather than nominating conventions, to choose candidates for office. As attention shifted from the cities to the states, reform governors throughout the country earned greater visibility. Joseph Folk, Steffens’s hero in St. Louis, became the governor of Missouri in 1904. Hiram Johnson won fame in California for his shrewd and forceful campaign against the Southern Pacific Railroad. In the East, the cause of reform was upheld by Charles Evans Hughes in New York and Woodrow Wilson, the former president of Princeton University, in New Jersey. Robert M. La Follette became the most famous reform governor. A graduate of the University of Wisconsin, La Follette served three terms in Congress during the late 1880s. A staunch Republican, he supported the tariff and other Republican doctrines, but the Democratic landslide of 1890 turned him out of office. Moving to state politics, he became interested in reform,



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 spurred in part, as so many were, by the depression of the 1890s. In 1901, he became governor of Wisconsin. Then forty-five years old, La Follette was talented, aggressive, and a superb stump speaker. In the following six years, he put together the “Wisconsin Idea,” one of the most important reform programs in the history of state government. He established an industrial commission, the first in the country, to regulate factory safety and sanitation. He improved education, workers’ compensation, public utility controls, and resource conservation. He lowered railroad rates and raised railroad taxes. Under La Follette’s prodding, Wisconsin became the first state to adopt a direct primary for all political nominations. It also became the first to adopt a state income tax. Like other progressives, La Follette drew on expert advice and relied on academic figures such as Richard Ely and Edward Ross at the University of Wisconsin. La Follette supporters established the first Legislative Reference Bureau in the university’s library; the bureau stocked the governor and his allies with facts and figures to support the measures they wanted. Theodore Roosevelt called La Follette’s Wisconsin “the laboratory of democracy,” and the Wisconsin Idea soon spread to many other states, including New York, California, Michigan, Iowa, and Texas. After 1905, the progressives looked more and more to Washington. For one thing, Teddy Roosevelt was there with his zest for publicity and his alluring grin. Progressives also had a growing sense that many concerns—corporations and conservation, factory safety and child labor—crossed state lines. Federal action seemed desirable; specific reforms fit into a larger plan perhaps best seen from the nation’s center. Within a few years, La Follette and Hiram Johnson became senators, and while reform went on back home, the focus of progressivism shifted to Washington.

Read the Document


Theodore Roosevelt,
 from The Strenuous Life (1900)

The Republican Roosevelt
 How would you describe the personality and programs of Theodore Roosevelt? When President William McKinley died of gunshot wounds in September 1901, Vice President Theodore Roosevelt succeeded him in the White House. The new president initially vowed to carry on McKinley’s policies. He continued some, developed others of his own, and in the end brought to them all the particular exuberance of his own personality. At age forty-two, Roosevelt was then the youngest president in American history. In contrast to the dignified McKinley, he was open, aggressive, and high spirited. At his desk by 8:30 every morning, he worked through the day, usually with visitors for breakfast, lunch, and dinner. Politicians, labor leaders, industrialists, poets, artists, and writers paraded through the White House. If McKinley cut down on presidential isolation, Roosevelt virtually ended it. The presidency, he thought, was the “bully pulpit,” a forum of ideas and leadership for the nation. The president was “a steward of the people bound actively and affirmatively to do all he could for the people.” Self-confident, Roosevelt enlisted talented associates, including Elihu Root, secretary of war and later secretary of state; William Howard Taft, secretary of war; Gifford Pinchot, the nation’s chief forester and leading conservationist; and Oliver Wendell Holmes, Jr., whom he named to the Supreme Court.

 This photograph of TR (Theodore Roosevelt) captures key parts of his personality: exuberant, jovial, expansive, self-confident, personally warm, outgoing, aggressive, spirited, and friendly. These characteristics, among others, are important because they shaped his presidency between 1901 and 1909.

 In 1901, Roosevelt invited Booker T. Washington, the prominent African American educator, to dinner at the White House. Many southerners protested—“a crime equal to treason,” a newspaper said—and they protested again when Roosevelt appointed several African Americans to important federal offices in South Carolina and Mississippi. At first, Roosevelt considered building a biracial “black-and-tan” southern Republican party, thinking it would foster racial progress and his own renomination in 1904. He denounced lynching and ordered the Justice Department to act against peonage. But Roosevelt soon retreated. In some areas of the South, he supported “lily-white” Republican organizations, and his policies often reflected his own belief in African American inferiority. He said nothing when a race riot broke out in Atlanta in 1906, although twelve persons died. He joined others in blaming African American soldiers stationed near Brownsville, Texas, after a night of violence there in August 1906. Acting quickly and on little evidence, he discharged “without honor” three companies of African American troops. Six of the soldiers who were discharged held the Congressional Medal of Honor.

The Republican Roosevelt


Busting the Trusts
 “There is a widespread conviction in the minds of the American people that the great corporations known as trusts are in certain of their features and tendencies hurtful to the general welfare,” Roosevelt reported to Congress in 1901. Like most people, however, the president wavered on the trusts. Large-scale production and industrial growth, he believed, were natural and beneficial; they needed only to be controlled. Still, he distrusted the trusts’ impact on local enterprise and individual opportunity. Distinguishing between “good” and “bad” trusts, he pledged to protect the former while controlling the latter. At first, Roosevelt hoped the combination of investigative journalism and public opinion would be enough to uncover and correct business evils, and in public he both praised and attacked the trusts. Mr. Dooley poked fun at his wavering: “‘Th’ trusts,’ says he, ‘are heejous monsthers built up be th’ enlightened intherprise iv th’ men that have done so much to advance progress in our beloved country,’ he says. ‘On wan hand I wud stamp thim undher fut; on th’ other hand not so fast.”’ In 1903, Roosevelt asked Congress to create a Department of Commerce and Labor, with a Bureau of Corporations empowered to investigate corporations engaged in interstate commerce. Congress balked; Roosevelt called in reporters and, in an offthe-record interview, charged that John D. Rockefeller had organized the opposition to the measure. The press spread the word, and in the outcry that followed, the proposal passed easily in a matter of weeks. Roosevelt was delighted. With the new Bureau of Corporations publicizing its findings, he thought, the glare of publicity would eliminate most corporate abuses. Roosevelt also undertook direct legal action. On February 18, 1902, he instructed the Justice Department to bring suit against the Northern Securities Company for violation of the Sherman Antitrust Act. It was a shrewd move. A mammoth holding company, Northern Securities controlled the massive rail networks of the Northern Pacific, Great Northern, and Chicago, Burlington & Quincy railroads. Some of the most prominent names in business were behind the giant company—J. P. Morgan and Company; the Rockefeller interests; Kuhn, Loeb and Company; and railroad operators James J. Hill and Edward H. Harriman. Shocked by Roosevelt’s action, Morgan charged that the president had not acted like a “gentleman,” and Hill talked glumly of having “to fight for our lives against the political adventurers who have never done anything but pose and draw a salary.” Morgan rushed to Washington to complain and to ask whether there were plans to “attack my other interests,” notably U.S. Steel. “No,” Roosevelt replied, “unless we find out they have done something that we regard as wrong.” In 1904, the Supreme Court, in a 5 to 4 decision, upheld the suit against Northern Securities and ordered the company dissolved. Roosevelt was jubilant, and he followed up the victory with several other antitrust suits. In 1902, he had moved against the beef trust, an action applauded by western farmers and urban consumers alike. After a lull, he initiated suits in 1906 and 1907 against the American Tobacco Company, the Du Pont Corporation, the New Haven Railroad, and Standard Oil. But Roosevelt’s policies were not always clear, nor his actions always consistent. He invited Morgan to the White House to confer with him and allowed the president of National City Bank to preview a draft of the president’s third annual message to Congress.



 Roosevelt also asked for (and received) business support in his bid for reelection in 1904. Large donations came in from industrial leaders, and Morgan himself later testified that he gave $150,000 to Roosevelt’s campaign. In 1907, acting in part to avert a threatened financial panic, the president permitted Morgan’s U.S. Steel to absorb the Tennessee Coal and Iron Company, an important competitor. Roosevelt, in truth, was not a trustbuster, although he was frequently called that. William Howard Taft, his successor in the White House, initiated forty-three antitrust indictments in four years—nearly twice as many as the twenty-five Roosevelt initiated in the seven years of his presidency. Instead, Roosevelt used antitrust threats to keep businesses within bounds. Regulation, he believed, was a better way to control large-scale enterprise.

“Square Deal” in the Coalfields
 A few months after announcing the Northern Securities suit, Roosevelt intervened in a major labor dispute involving the anthracite coal miners of northeastern Pennsylvania. Led by John Mitchell, a moderate labor leader, the United Mine Workers demanded wage increases, an eight-hour workday, and company recognition of the union. The coal companies refused, and in May 1902, one hundred forty thousand miners walked off the job. The mines closed. As the months passed and the strike continued, coal prices rose. With winter coming on, schools, hospitals, and factories ran short of coal. Public opinion turned against the companies. Morgan and other industrial leaders privately urged them to settle, but George F. Baer, head of one of the largest companies, refused: “The rights and interests of the laboring man,” Baer said, “will be protected and cared for—not by the labor agitators, but by the Christian men to whom God in his infinite wisdom has given the control of the property interests of this country.” Roosevelt was furious. Complaining of the companies’ arrogance, he invited both sides in the dispute to an October 1902 conference at the White House. There, Mitchell took a moderate tone and offered to submit the issues to arbitration, but the companies again refused to budge. Roosevelt ordered the army to prepare to seize the mines and then leaked word of his intent to Wall Street leaders. Alarmed, Morgan and others again urged settlement of the dispute, and at last the companies retreated. They agreed to accept the recommendations of an independent commission the president would appoint. In late October, the strikers returned to work, and in March 1903, the commission awarded them a 10 percent wage increase and a cut in working hours. It recommended, however, against union recognition. The coal companies, in turn, were encouraged to raise prices to offset the wage increase. More and more, Roosevelt saw the federal government as an honest and impartial “broker” between powerful elements in society. Rather than leaning toward labor, he pursued a middle way to curb corporate and labor abuses, abolish privilege, and enlarge individual opportunity. Conservative by temperament, he sometimes backed reforms in part to head off more radical measures. During the 1904 campaign, Roosevelt called his actions in the coal miners’ strike a “square deal” for both labor and capital, a term that stuck to his administration. Roosevelt was not the first president to take a stand for labor, but he was the first to bring opposing sides in a labor dispute to the White House to settle it.



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 He was the first to threaten to seize a major industry, and he was the first to appoint an arbitration commission whose decision both sides agreed to accept.

Roosevelt Progressivism at
 its Height What were the major measures of Theodore Roosevelt’s term from 1905 to 1909? In the election of 1904, the popular Roosevelt soundly drubbed his Democratic opponent, Alton B. Parker of New York, and the Socialist party candidate, Eugene V. Debs of Indiana. Roosevelt attracted a large campaign chest and won votes everywhere. In a landslide victory, he received 57 percent of the vote to Parker’s 38 percent, and on election night, he savored the public’s confidence. Overjoyed, he pledged that “under no circumstances will I be a candidate for or accept another nomination,” a statement he later regretted.

 jurisdiction to include oil pipeline, express, and sleeping car companies. ICC orders were binding, pending any court appeals, thus placing the burden of proof of injustice on the companies. Delighted, Roosevelt viewed the Hepburn Act as a major step in his plan for continuous expert federal control over industry.

Cleaning up Food and Drugs
 Soon Roosevelt was dealing with two other important bills, these aimed at regulating the food and drug industries. Muckraking articles had touched frequently on filthy conditions in meatpacking houses, but Upton Sinclair’s The Jungle (1906) set off a storm of

Read the Document


 Upton Sinclair, from

The Jungle (1906)


THE ELECTION OF 1904
Candidate T. Roosevelt Parker Debs Swallow 
Party
Republican
Democrat
Socialist
Prohibition


Popular
Vote
7,623,486
5,077,911
402,400
258,596


Electoral
Vote


Regulating the Railroads
 Following his election, Roosevelt, in late 1904, laid out a reform program that included railroad regulation, employers’ liability for federal employees, greater federal control over corporations, and laws regulating child labor, factory inspection, and slum clearance in the District of Columbia. He turned first to railroad regulation. In 1903, he had worked with Congress to pass the Elkins Act to prohibit railroad rebates and increase the powers of the Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC). The Elkins Act, a moderate law, was framed with the consent of railroad leaders. In 1904 and 1905, the president wanted much more, and he urged Congress to empower the ICC to set reasonable and nondiscriminatory rates and prevent inequitable practices. Widespread demand for railroad regulation strengthened Roosevelt’s hand. In the Midwest and farther west, the issue was a popular one, and reform governors La Follette in Wisconsin and Albert B. Cummins in Iowa urged federal action. Roosevelt maneuvered cannily. As the legislative battle opened, he released figures showing that Standard Oil had reaped $750,000 a year from railroad rebates. He also skillfully traded congressional support for a strong railroad measure in return for his promise to postpone a reduction of the tariff, a stratagem that came back to plague President Taft. Triumph came with passage of the Hepburn Act of 1906. A significant achievement, the act strengthened the rate-making power of the Interstate Commerce Commission. It increased membership on the ICC from five to seven, empowered it to fix reasonable maximum railroad rates, and broadened its

 A poster for the movie version of Upton Sinclair’s The Jungle promises a “wonderful story of the beef packing industry.” The conditions that Sinclair described in the book brought to public attention the scandals of the meatpacking industry knowingly selling diseased meat and the filthy, disease-ridden, dangerous conditions in which the workers toiled for their subsistence wages.



Roosevelt Progressivism at its Height


 indignation. Ironically, Sinclair had set out to write a novel about the packinghouse workers, the “wage slaves of the Beef Trust,” hoping to do for wage slavery what Harriet Beecher Stowe had done for chattel slavery. But readers largely ignored his story of the workers and seized instead on the graphic descriptions of the things that went into their meat:

 of patent medicines in several sensational articles in Collier’s. Patent medicines, Adams pointed out, contained mostly alcohol, drugs, and “undiluted fraud.” Dr. Harvey W. Wiley, the chief chemist in the Department of Agriculture, led a “poison squad” of young assistants who experimented with the medicines. With evidence in hand, Wiley pushed for regulation; Roosevelt and the recently reorganized American Medical Association joined the fight, and the act passed on June 30, 1906. Requiring manufacturers to list certain ingredients on the label, it represented a pioneering effort to ban the manufacture and sale of adulterated, misbranded, or unsanitary food or drugs.

 There would be meat stored in great piles in rooms; and the water from leaky roofs would drip over it, and thousands of rats would race about on it. It was too dark in these storage places to see well, but a man could run his hand over these piles of meat and sweep off handfuls of the dried dung of rats. These rats were nuisances, and the packers would put poisoned bread out for them; they would die, and then rats, bread, and meat would go into the hoppers together.

Conserving the Land
 An expert on birds, Roosevelt loved nature and the wilderness, and some of his most enduring accomplishments came in the field of conservation. Working closely with Gifford Pinchot, chief of the Forest Service, he established the first comprehensive national conservation policy. To Roosevelt, conservation meant the wise use of natural resources, not locking them away, so those who thought the wilderness should be preserved rather than developed generally opposed his policies. Using experts in the federal government, Roosevelt undertook a major reclamation program, created the federal Reclamation Service, and strengthened the forest preserve program in the Department of Agriculture. Broadening the concept of conservation, he placed power sites, coal lands, and oil reserves as well as national forest in the public domain. When Roosevelt took office in 1901, there were 45 million acres in government preserves. In 1908, there were almost

 Sinclair was disappointed at the reaction. “I aimed at the public’s heart,” he later said, “and by accident I hit it in the stomach.” He had, indeed. After reading The Jungle, Roosevelt ordered an investigation. The result, he said, was “hideous,” and he threatened to publish the entire “sickening report” if Congress did not act. Meat sales plummeted in the United States and Europe. Demand for reform grew. Alarmed, the meat packers themselves supported a reform law, which they hoped would be just strong enough to still the clamor. The Meat Inspection Act of 1906, stronger than the packers wanted, set rules for sanitary meatpacking and government inspection of meat products. A second measure, the Pure Food and Drug Act, passed more easily. Samuel Hopkins Adams, a muckraker, exposed the dangers

North Cascades 1968
Kobuk
Valley
1978/1980


Gates of
 the Arctic 1978/1980

Isle Royale


C A N A D A


Olympic
1909/1938


Mt. Rainier


 WrangelDenali St. Elias 1917/1980 1978/1980 Lake Clark 1978/1980 Katmai 1918/1980 Glacier Bay Kenai Fjords 1978/1980 1925/1980

Glacier
Theodore
Roosevelt
1947/1978


Crater Lake


Acadia
1916/1929


Wind Cave 1903


Yellowstone


Badlands
1929/1978


Grand Teton


Redwood


Voyageurs
1971/1975


Lassen Volcanic
1907/1916
Yosemite
Haleakala
1916/1960


Kings Canyon
1890/1940
Sequoia


Channel
Islands
1938/1980


PACIFIC OCEAN

Joshua Tree
1936/1994


Shenandoah
1926/1935


Arches 1929/1978


Zion
1909/1919


Death Valley
1933/1994


Hawaii Volcanoes
1916/1961


Rocky Mountain


Capitol Reef
1937/1971


Great Basin
1922/1986


Mammoth Cave


Canyonlands 1964
Mesa Verde 1906


Grand
Canyon
1908/1919
Saguaro
1933/1994


Great Smoky Mountains


Bryce Canyon
1923/1928


Hot Springs
1832/1921


Petrified Forest
1906/1962


ATLANTIC OCEAN

Carlsbad Caverns
1923/1930
Guadalupe Mountains
1966/1972
Big Bend 1935/1944


 National parks with date of initial protection and date of current designation

MEXICO
National forests 
Virgin Islands
Puerto
Rico


Virgin Is.


NATIONAL PARKS AND FORESTS
During the presidency of Theodore Roosevelt, who considered conservation his most important domestic achievement, millions of acres of land were set aside for national parks and forests. 
Biscayne 1968/1980
Dry Tortugas
1935/1992


Everglades




 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 195 million. That year, he called a National Conservation Congress attended by forty-four governors and hundreds of experts. Roosevelt formed the National Commission on the Conservation of Natural Resources to look after waters, forests, lands, and minerals. With Pinchot as head, it drew up an inventory of the nation’s natural resources. As 1908 approached, Roosevelt became increasingly strident in his demand for sweeping reforms. He attacked “malefactors of great wealth,” urged greater federal regulatory powers, criticized the conservatism of the federal courts, and called for laws protecting factory workers. Many business leaders blamed him for a severe financial panic in the autumn of 1907, and conservatives in Congress stiffened their opposition. Divisions between Republican conservatives and progressives grew. Immensely popular, Roosevelt prepared in 1908 to turn over the White House to William Howard Taft, his close friend and colleague. “The Roosevelt policies will not go out with the Roosevelt administration,” a party leader said. “If Taft weakens, he will annihilate himself.” As expected, Taft soundly defeated the Democratic standard-bearer William Jennings Bryan, who was making his third try for the presidency. The Republicans retained control of Congress. Taft prepared to move into the White House, ready and willing to carry on the Roosevelt legacy.

The Ordeal of William
Howard Taft
 Why was the presidency of William Howard Taft so difficult for him? The Republican national convention that nominated Taft had not satisfied either Roosevelt or Taft. True, Taft won the presidential nomination as planned, but conservative Republicans beat back the attempts of progressive Republicans to influence the convention. They named a conservative, James S. Sherman, for vice president and built a platform that reflected conservative views on labor, the courts, and other issues. Taft wanted a pledge to lower the tariff but got only a promise of revision, which might lower— or raise—it. La Follette, Cummins, Jonathan P. Dolliver of Iowa, Albert J. Beveridge of Indiana, and other progressive Republicans were openly disappointed. Taking office in 1909, Taft felt “just a bit like a fish out of water.” The son of a distinguished Ohio family and a graduate of Yale Law School, he became an Ohio judge, solicitor general of the United States, and a judge of the federal circuit court. In 1900, McKinley asked him to head the Philippine Commission, charged with the difficult and challenging task of forming a civil government in the Philippines. Later Taft was named the first governor general of the Philippines. In 1904, Roosevelt appointed him secretary of war. In all these positions, Taft made his mark as a skillful administrator. He worked quietly behind the scenes, avoided controversy, and shared none of Roosevelt’s zest for politics. A good-natured man, Taft had personal charm and infectious humor. He fled from fights rather than seeking them out, and he disliked political maneuvering, preferring instead quiet solitude. “I don’t like politics,” he said. “I don’t like the limelight.”

THE ELECTION OF 1908
Candidate Taft Bryan Debs Chafin 
Party
Republican
Democrat
Socialist
Prohibition


Popular
Vote
7,678,908
6,409,104
402,820
252,821


Electoral
Vote


 Weighing close to three hundred pounds, Taft enjoyed conversation, golf and bridge, good food, and plenty of rest. Compared to the hardworking Roosevelt and Wilson, he was lazy. He was also honest, kindly, and amiable, and in his own way he knew how to get things done. Reflective, he preferred the life of a judge, but his wife, Helen H. Taft, who enjoyed politics, prodded him toward the White House. When a Supreme Court appointment opened in 1906, Taft reluctantly turned it down. “Ma wants him to wait and be president,” his youngest son said. Taft’s years as president were not happy. Mrs. Taft’s health soon collapsed, and as it turned out, Taft presided over a Republican party torn with tensions that Roosevelt had either brushed aside or concealed. The tariff, business regulation, and other issues split conservatives and progressives, and Taft often wavered or sided with the conservatives. Taft revered the past and distrusted change; although an ardent supporter of Roosevelt, he never had Roosevelt’s faith in the ability of government to impose reform and alter individual behavior. He named five corporation attorneys to his cabinet, leaned more to business than to labor, and spoke of a desire to “clean out the unions.” At that time and later, Taft’s reputation suffered by comparison to the flair of Roosevelt and the moral majesty of Woodrow Wilson. He deserved better. Taft was an honest and sincere president, who—sometimes firm, sometimes befuddled—faced a series of important and troublesome problems during his term of office.

Party Insurgency
 Taft started his term with an attempt to curb the powerful Republican speaker of the House, Joseph “Uncle Joe” Cannon of Illinois. Using the powers of his position, Cannon had been setting House procedures, appointing committees, and virtually dictating legislation. Straightforward and crusty, he often opposed reform. In March 1909, thirty Republican congressmen joined Taft’s effort to curb Cannon’s power, and the president sensed success. But Cannon retaliated and, threatening to block all tariff bills, forced a compromise. Taft stopped the anti-Cannon campaign in return for Cannon’s pledge to help with tariff cuts. Republicans were divided over the tariff, and there was a growing party insurgency against high rates. The House quickly passed a bill providing for lower rates, but in the Senate, protectionists raised them. Senate leader Nelson W. Aldrich of Rhode Island introduced a revised bill that added more than eight hundred amendments to the rates approved in the House. Angry, La Follette and other Republicans attacked the bill as the child of special interests. In speeches on the Senate floor they called themselves “progressives,” invoked Roosevelt’s name,

The Ordeal of William Howard Taft


 and urged Taft to defeat the high-tariff proposal. Caught between protectionists and progressives, Taft wavered, then tried to compromise. In the end, he backed Aldrich. The Payne-Aldrich Act, passed in November 1909, called for higher rates than the original House bill, though it lowered them from the Dingley Tariff of 1897. An unpopular law, Payne-Aldrich helped discredit Taft and revealed the tensions in the Republican party. Republican progressives and conservatives drifted apart. Thinskinned, Taft resented the persistent pinpricks of the progressives who criticized him for virtually everything he did. He tried to find middle ground but leaned more and more toward the conservatives. During a nationwide speaking tour in the autumn of 1909, he praised Aldrich, scolded the low-tariff insurgents, and called the Payne-Aldrich Act “the best bill that the Republican party ever passed.” Traveling through the Midwest, he pointedly ignored La Follette, Cummins, and other progressive Republicans. By early 1910, progressive Republicans in Congress no longer looked to Taft for leadership. As before, they challenged Cannon’s power, and Taft wavered. In an outcome embarrassing to the president, the progressives won, managing to curtail Cannon’s authority to dictate committee assignments and schedule debate. In progressive circles there was growing talk of a Roosevelt return to the White House.

The Ballinger-Pinchot Affair
 The conservation issue dealt another blow to relations between Roosevelt and President Taft. In 1909, Richard A. Ballinger, Taft’s secretary of the interior, offered for sale a million acres of public land that Pinchot, who had stayed on as Taft’s chief forester, had withdrawn from sale. Pinchot, fearing that Ballinger would hurt conservation programs, protested and, seizing on a report that Ballinger had helped sell valuable Alaskan coal lands to a syndicate that included J. P. Morgan, asked Taft to intervene. After investigating, Taft supported Ballinger on every count, although he asked Pinchot to remain in office. Pinchot refused to drop the matter. Behind the scenes, he provided material for two anti-Ballinger magazine articles, and he wrote a critical public letter that Senator Dolliver of Iowa read to the Senate. Taft had had enough. He fired the insubordinate Pinchot, an action which, though appropriate, again lost support for Taft. Newspapers followed the controversy for months, and muckrakers assailed the administration’s “surrender” to Morgan and other “despoilers of the national heritage.” The Ballinger-Pinchot controversy obscured Taft’s important contributions to conservation. He won from Congress the power to remove lands from sale, and he used it to conserve more land than Roosevelt did. Still, the controversy tarred Taft, and it upset his old friend Roosevelt. Pinchot hurried to Italy where Roosevelt was on tour; he talked again with Roosevelt within days of the ex-president’s arrival home in June 1910.



 a special Commerce Court to hear appeals from ICC decisions because most judges were traditionally conservative in outlook and usually rejected attempts to regulate railroad rates. They also thought the railroads had been consulted too closely in drawing up the bill. Democratic and Republican progressives tried to amend the bill to strengthen it; Taft made support of it a test of party loyalty. The Mann-Elkins Act of 1910 gave something to everyone. It gave the ICC power to set rates, stiffened long- and short-haul regulations, and placed telephone and telegraph companies under ICC jurisdiction. These provisions delighted progressives. The act also created a Commerce Court, pleasing conservatives. In a tradeoff, conservative Republican Senate leaders pledged their support for a statehood bill for Arizona and New Mexico, which were both predicted to be Democratic. In return, enough Democratic senators promised to vote for the Commerce Court provision to pass the bill. While pleased with the act, Taft and the Republican party lost further ground. In votes on key provisions of the Mann-Elkins Act, Taft raised the issue of party regularity, and progressive Republicans defied him. Taft attempted to defeat the progressive Republicans in the 1910 elections. He helped form antiprogressive organizations, and he campaigned against progressive Republican candidates for the Senate. In California, he opposed Hiram Johnson, the progressive Republican champion; in Wisconsin, the home of La Follette, he sent Vice President James S. Sherman to take control of the state convention. Progressive Republicans retaliated

Taft Alienates the Progressives
 Interested in railroad regulation, Taft backed a bill in 1910 to empower the ICC to fix maximum railroad rates. Progressive Republicans favored that plan but attacked Taft’s suggestion of

 According to this 1913 cartoon, the new income tax legislation distributed the tax burden more evenly, so that contributions from the wealthy eased some of the burden on the working class.



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 now, Roosevelt listened to anti-Taft Republicans who urged him by organizing a nationwide network of anti-Taft Progressive to run for president in 1912. In February 1912, he announced, Republican Clubs. “My hat is in the ring.” The 1910 election results were a major setback for Taft and the Republicans—especially conservative Republicans. A key issue in the election, the high cost of living, gave an edge to Differing Philosophies in the the progressive wings in both major parties, lending support Election of 1912 to their attack on the tariff and the trusts. In party primaries, progressive Republicans overwhelmed most Taft candidates, Delighted Democrats looked on as Taft and Roosevelt fought for the and in the general election, they tended to fare better than the Republican nomination. As the incumbent president, Taft controlled conservatives, which increased progressive influence in the the party machinery, and when the Republican convention met in Republican Party. June 1912, he took the nomination. In early July, the Democrats For Republicans of all persuasions, however, it was a difficult met in Baltimore and, confident of victory for the first time in two election. The Democrats swept the urban-industrial states from decades, struggled through forty-six ballots before finally nominatNew York to Illinois. New York, New Jersey, Indiana, and even ing Woodrow Wilson, the reform-minded governor of New Jersey. Taft’s Ohio elected Democratic governors. For the first time since A month later, some of the anti-Taft and progressive 1894, Republicans lost control of both the House and the Senate. Republicans—now calling themselves the Progressive Party— In all, they lost fifty-eight seats in the House and ten in the Senate. whooped it up in Chicago. Roosevelt was there to give a stirring Disappointed, Taft called it “not only a landslide, but a tidal wave “Confession of Faith” and listen to the delegates sing: and holocaust all rolled into one general cataclysm.” Despite the defeat, Taft pushed through several imporThou wilt not cower in the dust, tant measures before his term ended. With the help of the new Roosevelt, O Roosevelt! Democratic House, he backed laws to regulate safety in mines and Thy gleaming sword shall never rust, on railroads, create a Children’s Bureau in the federal government, Roosevelt, O Roosevelt! establish employers’ liability for all work done on government contracts, and mandate an eight-hour workday for government workers. Watch the Video Bull Moose Campaign Speech In 1909, Congress initiated a constitutional amendment authorizing an income tax, which, along with woman suffrage, was one of the most significant legislative measures of the twentieth century. The Sixteenth Amendment took effect early in 1913. A few months later, an important progressive goal was realized when the direct election of senators was ratified as the Seventeenth Amendment to the Constitution. An ardent supporter of competition, Taft relentlessly pressed a campaign against trusts. The Sherman Antitrust Act, he said in 1911, “is a good law that ought to be enforced, and I propose to enforce it.” That year, the Supreme Court in cases against Standard Oil and American Tobacco established the “rule of reason,” which allowed the Court to determine whether a business presented “reasonable” restraint on trade. Taft thought the decisions gave the Court too much discretion, and he pushed ahead with the antitrust effort. In October 1911, he sued U.S. Steel for its acquisition of the Tennessee Coal and Iron Company in 1907. Roosevelt had approved the acquisition (see p. 547), and the suit seemed designed to impugn his action. Enraged, he attacked Taft, and Taft, for once, fought Theodore Roosevelt campaigns for President in 1912. Roosevelt champions national health back. He accused Roosevelt of undermin- insurance and tries to ride his progressive Bull Moose Party back to the White House. It’s an idea ing the conservative tradition in the country ahead of its time; health insurance is a rarity and medical fees are relatively low because doctors and began working to undercut the influence cannot do much for most patients. But medical breakthroughs are beginning to revolutionize of the progressive Republicans. Increasingly hospitals and drive up costs.

 Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom

 Naming Roosevelt for president at its convention, the Progressive Party—soon known as the Bull Moose Party—set the stage for the first important three-cornered presidential contest since 1860. Taft was out of the running before the campaign even began. “I think I might as well give up so far as being a candidate is concerned,” he said in July. “There are so many people in the country who don’t like me.” Taft stayed at home and made no speeches before the election. Roosevelt campaigned strenuously, even completing one speech after being shot in the chest by an anti-third-term fanatic. “I have a message to deliver,” he said, “and will deliver it as long as there is life in my body.” Roosevelt’s message involved a program he called the New Nationalism. An important phase in the shaping of twentiethcentury American political thought, it demanded a national approach to the country’s affairs and a strong president to deal with them. The New Nationalism called for efficiency in government and society. It exalted the executive and the expert; urged social-justice reforms to protect workers, women, and children; and accepted “good” trusts. The New Nationalism encouraged large concentrations of labor and capital, serving the nation’s interests under a forceful federal executive. For the first time in the history of a major political party, the Progressive campaign enlisted women in its organization. Jane Addams, the well-known settlement worker, seconded

Read the Document


Woodrow Wilson,
 from The New Freedom (1913)



 Roosevelt’s nomination at Chicago, and she and other women played a leading role in his campaign. Some labor leaders, who saw potential for union growth, and some business leaders, who saw relief from destructive competition and labor strife, supported the new party. Wilson, in contrast, set forth a program called the New Freedom that emphasized business competition and small government. A states’ rights Democrat, he wanted to rein in federal authority, using it only to sweep away special privilege, release individual energies, and restore competition. Drawing on the thinking of Louis D. Brandeis, the brilliant shaper of reform-minded law, he echoed the Progressive party’s social-justice objectives, while continuing to attack Roosevelt’s planned state. For Wilson, the vital issue was not a planned economy but a free one. “The history of liberty is the history of the limitation of governmental power,” he said in October 1912. “If America is not to have free enterprise, then she can have freedom of no sort whatever.” In the New Nationalism and New Freedom, the election of 1912 offered competing philosophies of government. Both Roosevelt and Wilson saw the central problem of the American nation as economic growth and its effect on individuals and society. Both focused on the government’s relation to business, both believed in bureaucratic reform, and both wanted to use government to protect the ordinary citizen. But Roosevelt welcomed federal power, national planning, and business growth; Wilson distrusted them all. On election day, Wilson won 6.3 million votes to 4.1 million for Roosevelt (who had recovered quickly from his wound) and 900,000 for Eugene V. Debs, the Socialist Party candidate. Taft, the incumbent president, finished third with 3.5 million votes; he carried only Vermont and Utah for 8 electoral votes. The Democrats also won outright control of both houses.

Election of 1912


 Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom

Popular Vote


Electoral Vote by State
DEMOCRATIC
Woodrow Wilson 


6,293,454


PROGRESSIVE (BULL MOOSE)
Theodore Roosevelt 


4,119,538


REPUBLICAN
William H. Taft 


 What were the central principles of Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom?

3,484,980
1,135,697


MINOR PARTIES

15,033,939




































































 If under Roosevelt social reform took on the excitement of a circus, “under Wilson it acquired the dedication of a sunrise service.” Born in Virginia in 1856 and raised in the South, Wilson was the son of a Presbyterian minister. As a young man, he wanted a career in public service, and he trained himself carefully in history and oratory. A moralist, he reached judgments easily. Once reached, almost nothing shook them. Opponents called him stubborn and smug. “He gives me the creeps,” a Maryland ward boss said. “The time I met him, he said something to me, and I didn’t know whether God or him was talking.” After graduating from Princeton University and the University of Virginia Law School, Wilson found that practicing law bored him. Shifting to history, from 1890 to 1902 he served as professor of jurisprudence and political economy at Princeton. In 1902, he became president of the university. Eight years later, he was governor of New Jersey, where he led a campaign to reform election procedures, abolish corrupt practices, and strengthen railroad regulation. Wilson’s rise was rapid, and he knew relatively little about national issues and personalities. But he learned fast, and in some



 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

 ways the lack of experience served him well. He had few political debts to repay, and he brought fresh perspectives to older issues. Ideas intrigued Wilson; details bored him. Although he was outgoing at times, he could also be cold and aloof, and aides soon learned that he preferred loyalty and flattery to candid criticism. Prone to self-righteousness, Wilson often turned differences of opinion into bitter personal quarrels. Like Roosevelt, he believed in strong presidential leadership. A scholar of the party system, he cooperated closely with Democrats in Congress, and his legislative record placed him among the most effective presidents in terms of passing bills that he supported. Forbidding in individual conversation, Wilson could move crowds with graceful oratory. Unlike Taft, and to a greater degree than Roosevelt, he could inspire. His inaugural address was eloquent. “The Nation,” he said, “has been deeply stirred, stirred by a solemn passion, stirred by the knowledge of wrong, of ideals lost, of government too often debauched and made an instrument of evil. The feelings with which we face this new age of right and opportunity sweep across our heartstrings like some air out of God’s own presence.”

The New Freedom in Action
 On the day of his inauguration, Wilson called Congress into special session to lower the tariff. When the session opened on April 8, 1913, Wilson himself was there, the first president since John Adams in 1801 to appear personally before Congress. In forceful language, he urged Congress to reduce tariff rates. As the bill moved through Congress, Wilson showed exceptional skill. He worked closely with congressional leaders, and when lobbyists threatened the bill in the Senate, he appealed for popular support. The result was a triumph for Wilson and the Democratic party. The Underwood Tariff Act passed in 1913. It lowered tariff rates about 15 percent and removed duties from sugar, wool, and several other consumer goods. To make up for lost revenue, the act also levied a modest graduated income tax, authorized under the just ratified Sixteenth Amendment. Marking a significant shift in the American tax structure, it imposed a 1 percent tax on individuals and corporations earning more than $4,000 annually and an additional 1 percent tax on incomes more than $20,000. Above all, the act reflected a new unity within the Democratic party, which had worked together to pass a difficult tariff law. Wilson himself emerged as an able leader. “At a single stage,” a foreign editor said, “[he went] from the man of promise to the man of achievement.” Encouraged by his success, Wilson decided to keep Congress in session through the hot Washington summer. Now he focused on banking reform, and the result in December 1913 was the Federal Reserve Act, the most important domestic law of his administration. Meant to provide the United States with a sound yet flexible currency, the act established the country’s first efficient banking system since Andrew Jackson killed the second Bank of the United States in 1832. It created twelve regional banks, each to serve the banks of its district. The regional banks answered to a Federal Reserve Board, appointed by the president, which governed the nationwide system.

 A compromise law, the act blended public and private control of the banking system. Private bankers owned the federal reserve banks but answered to the presidentially appointed Federal Reserve Board. The reserve banks were authorized to issue currency, and through the discount rate—the interest rate at which they loaned money to member banks—they could raise or lower the amount of money in circulation. Monetary affairs no longer depended solely on the price of gold. Within a year, nearly half the nation’s banking resources were in the Federal Reserve System. The Clayton Antitrust Act (1914) completed Wilson’s initial legislative program. Like previous antitrust measures, it reflected confusion over how to discipline a growing economy without putting a brake on output. In part it was a response to the revelations of the Pujo Committee of the House, publicized by Brandeis in a disquieting series of articles, “Other People’s Money.” In its investigation of Wall Street, the committee discovered a pyramid of money and power capped by the Morgan-Rockefeller empire that, through “interlocking directorates,” controlled companies worth $22 billion, more than one-tenth of the national wealth. The Clayton Act outlawed such directorates and prohibited unfair trade practices. It forbade pricing policies that created monopoly, and it made corporate officers personally responsible for antitrust violations. Delighting Samuel Gompers and the labor movement, the act declared that unions were not conspiracies in restraint of trade, outlawed the use of injunctions in labor disputes unless necessary to protect property, and approved lawful strikes and picketing. To Gompers’s dismay, the courts continued to rule against union activity. A related law established a powerful Federal Trade Commission to oversee business methods. Composed of five members, the commission could demand special and annual reports, investigate complaints, and order corporate compliance, subject to court review. At first, Wilson opposed the commission concept, which was an approach more suitable to Roosevelt’s New Nationalism, but he changed his mind and, along with Brandeis, called it the cornerstone of his antitrust plan. To reassure business leaders, he appointed a number of conservatives to the new commission and to the Federal Reserve Board. In November 1914, Wilson proudly announced the completion of his New Freedom program. Tariff, banking, and antitrust laws promised a brighter future, he said, and it was now “a time of healing because a time of just dealing.” Many progressives were aghast. That Wilson could think society’s ills were so easily cured, the New Republic said, “casts suspicion either upon his own sincerity or upon his grasp of the realities of modern social and industrial life.”

Wilson Moves Toward the
New Nationalism
 Distracted by the start of war in Europe, Wilson gave less attention to domestic issues for more than a year. When he returned to concern with reform, he adopted more and more of Roosevelt’s New Nationalism and blended it with the New Freedom to set it off from his earlier policies. One of Wilson’s problems was the Congress. To his dismay, the Republicans gained substantially in the 1914 elections. Reducing

 Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom

 the Democratic majority in the House, they swept key industrial and farm states. At the same time, a recession struck the economy, which had been hurt by the outbreak of the European war in August 1914. Some business leaders blamed the tariff and other New Freedom laws. On the defensive, Wilson soothed business sentiment and invited bankers and industrialists to the White House. He allowed companies fearful of antitrust actions to seek advice from the Justice Department. Preoccupied with such problems, Wilson blocked significant action in Congress through most of 1915. He refused to support a bill providing minimum wages for women workers, sidetracked a child labor bill on the ground that it was unconstitutional, and opposed a bill to establish long-term credits for farmers. He also refused to endorse woman suffrage, arguing that the right to vote was a state matter, not a federal one. Wilson’s record on race disappointed African Americans and many progressives. He had appealed to African American voters during the 1912 election, and a number of African American leaders campaigned for him. Soon after the inauguration, Oswald Garrison Villard, a leader of the NAACP, proposed a National Race Commission to study the problem of race relations. Initially sympathetic, Wilson rejected the idea because he feared he might lose southern Democratic votes in Congress. A Virginian himself, he appointed many Southerners to high office, and for the first time since the Civil War, southern views on race dominated the nation’s capital. At one of Wilson’s first cabinet meetings, the postmaster general proposed the segregation of all African Americans in the federal service. No one dissented, including Wilson. Several government bureaus promptly began to segregate workers in offices, shops, rest rooms, and restaurants. Employees who objected were fired. African American leaders protested, and they were joined by progressive leaders and clergymen. Surprised at the protest, Wilson backed quietly away from the policy, although he continued to insist that segregation benefited African Americans. As the year 1916 began, Wilson made a dramatic switch in focus and again pushed for substantial reforms. The result was a virtual river of reform laws, which was significant because it began the second, more national-minded phase of the New Freedom. With scarcely a glance over his shoulder, Wilson embraced important portions of Roosevelt’s New Nationalism campaign. In part, he was motivated by the approaching presidential election. A minority president, Wilson owed his victory in 1912 to the split in the Republican party, now almost healed. Roosevelt was moving back into Republican ranks, and there were issues connected with the war in Europe that he might use against Wilson. Moreover, many progressives were voicing disappointment with Wilson’s limited reforms and his failure to support more advanced reform legislation on matters such as farm credits, child labor, and woman suffrage. Moving quickly to patch up the problem, Wilson named Brandeis to the Supreme Court in January 1916. Popular among progressives, Brandeis was also the first person of Jewish faith to serve on the Court. When conservatives in the Senate tried to defeat the nomination, Wilson stood firm and won, earning further praise from progressives, Jews, and others. In May,



 he reversed his stand on farm loans and accepted a rural credits bill to establish farm-loan banks backed by federal funds. The Federal Farm Loan Act of 1916 created a Federal Farm Loan Board to give farmers credit similar to the Federal Reserve’s benefits for trade and industry. Wilson was already popular within the labor movement. Going beyond Roosevelt’s policies, which had sought a balance between business and labor, he defended union recognition and collective bargaining. In 1913, he appointed William B. Wilson, a respected leader of the United Mine Workers, as the first head of the Labor Department, and he strengthened the department’s Division of Conciliation. In 1914, in Ludlow, Colorado, state militia and mine guards fired machine guns into a tent colony of coal strikers, killing twenty-one men, women, and children. Outraged, Wilson stepped in and used federal troops to end the violence while negotiations to end the strike went on. In August 1916, a threatened railroad strike again revealed Wilson’s sympathies with labor. Like Roosevelt, he invited the two sides to the White House, where he urged the railroad companies to grant an eight-hour day and labor leaders to abandon the demand for overtime pay. Labor leaders accepted the proposal; railroad leaders did not. “I pray God to forgive you, I never can,” Wilson said as he left the room. Soon he signed the Adamson Act (1916) that imposed the eight-hour day on interstate railways and established a federal commission to study the railroad problem. Ending the threat of a strike, the act marked a milestone in the expansion of the federal government’s authority to regulate industry. With Wilson leading the way, the flow of reform legislation continued until the election. The Federal Workmen’s Compensation Act established workers’ compensation for government employees. The Keating-Owen Act, the first federal child labor law, prohibited the shipment in interstate commerce of products manufactured by children under the age of fourteen. It too expanded the authority of the federal government, though it was soon struck down by the Supreme Court. The Warehouse Act authorized licensed warehouses to issue negotiable receipts for farm products deposited with them. In September, Wilson signed the Tariff Commission Act creating an expert commission to recommend tariff rates. The same month, the Revenue Act of 1916 boosted income taxes and furthered tax reform. Four thousand members of the National American Woman Suffrage Association cheered when Wilson finally came out in support of woman suffrage. Two weeks later he endorsed the eight-hour day for all the nation’s workers. The 1916 presidential election was close, but Wilson won it on the issues of peace and progressivism. By the end of 1916, he and the Democratic party had enacted most of the important parts of Roosevelt’s Progressive party platform of 1912. To do it, Wilson abandoned portions of the New Freedom and accepted much of the New Nationalism, including greater federal power and commissions governing trade and tariffs. In mixing the two programs, he blended some of the competing doctrines of the Progressive Era, established the primacy of the federal government, and foreshadowed the pragmatic outlook of Franklin D. Roosevelt’s New Deal of the 1930s.

 Complete the Assignment Madam C. J. Walker: African American Business Pioneer on myhistorylab

Feature
Essay


Madam C. J. Walker
African American Business
Pioneer


A


 t the 1912 convention of the National Negro Business League, a group devoted to promoting African American businesses, a 45-year-old woman, Madam C. J. Walker, tried to catch the eye of Booker T. Washington, the League’s founder and head. But Washington ignored her until finally, her patience gone, she sprang to her feet and said, “Surely you are not going to shut the door in my face. I feel that I am in a business that is a credit to the womanhood of our race.” “I . . . came from the cotton fields of the South,” she went on. “I was promoted from there to the washtub; then I was promoted to the cook kitchen, and from there I promoted myself into the business of manufacturing hair goods and preparations . . . I have built my own factory on my own ground.” Had Washington listened, Madam Walker had a remarkable story to tell. She was born Sarah Breedlove in 1867 on a plantation in Delta, Louisiana, the first in her sharecropper family born free. Orphaned at age seven, she married at fourteen to escape a cruel brother-in-law and find a home. Her husband died when she was twenty, leaving her with a young daughter and a back already aching from years of picking cotton and doing laundry. Looking for a better life, she moved to St. Louis and then to Denver, working as a cook and laundress. In Denver, she married Charles J. Walker and began calling herself “Madam,” a title that lent prestige to a new business she had just begun. For years, Walker had had trouble with her hair. It came out in bunches, partly because of the painful “wrap and twist” method that was popular



 Photographs of Madam C. J. Walker before and after using her hair care formula. Madam Walker was the first black woman millionaire and a pioneer in the development and manufacture of beauty products for African American women.

 for styling African American hair. After trying various remedies, she developed her own formula that she said came to her in a dream. “I tried it on my friends,” she said. “It helped them. I made up my mind to begin to sell it.” Filling jars of the mixture in the attic of her home, she sold it door to door. Madam Walker began promoting her system of hair care in 1905. The Walker system called for women first to wash their hair with Madam Walker’s Vegetable Shampoo, then apply her Wonderful Hair Grower, add a light oil called Glossine, and finally press and relax the hair with a wide-toothed “hot comb.” As her business grew, Walker opened schools to teach her system, hired thousands of African American women as sales agents, and in 1910 moved her factory to Indianapolis for its central location. Knowing that white

 stores would not stock her products, she relied on churches and women’s clubs, two key institutions of the black community. Sales soon extended throughout the United States, Central America, and the Caribbean; Josephine Baker, the famous dancer, used Walker’s products in Paris. Dressed in white shirts and long black skirts, Walker agents became a familiar sight in African American neighborhoods everywhere. There were twenty thousand agents by 1916, most of them former maids, laundresses, and farm workers. “I have made it possible for many colored women to abandon the washtub for more pleasant and profitable occupation,” she said. As her income grew, Walker gave generously to various causes, including the YMCA, Mary McLeod Bethune’s Educational and Industrial Institute for Negro Girls (now Bethune-Cookman

College), the Tuskegee Institute, and
 the NAACP. “Lady Bountiful,” she was called, and she encouraged her agents to contribute to charity, too. “I love to use a part of what I make in trying to help others,” she said. When the country entered World War I, Walker helped sell war bonds and joined the many black leaders who encouraged African Americans to aid in the war effort, hoping that contributions to victory abroad would improve race relations at home. But she grew impatient as lynchings and other racial incidents continued. Angered by a race riot in East St. Louis, Illinois, in 1917, she supported the Negro Silent Protest Parade, in which ten thousand black New Yorkers marched in silence down Fifth Avenue while another twenty thousand African Americans looked on. Walker went to Washington to ask President Woodrow Wilson to support legislation making lynching a federal crime, but Wilson was too “busy” to see her. Refusing to give up, Walker donated $5,000 to the NAACP’s antilynching campaign and defended the rights of returning war veterans. In 1918, Walker built Villa Lewaro, a mansion overlooking the Hudson River above New York City, near the estate of John D. Rockefeller. Walker called her home a symbol, to show “young Negroes what a lone woman accomplished and to inspire them to do big things.” Madam Walker died at the villa in 1919, aged fifty-one. At her death, The Crisis, the journal of the NAACP, said she had “revolutionized the personal habits and appearance of millions of human beings.”

According to the Guinness Book of
World Records, Madam Walker was the
 first self-made woman millionaire. What she did, said Ida B. Wells-Barnett, the militant black leader, “made me take pride anew in Negro womanhood.” Mary McLeod Bethune, the black educator, said, “She has gone, but her work still lives and shall live as an inspiration to not only her race but to the world.” Walker bequeathed her company to her daughter—asking that a woman always serve at the head—but it began to fail during the Great Depression. Housed in the Walker Building, a National Historic Landmark, the Madam Walker Theatre Center today serves as a cultural center for the performing arts in downtown Indianapolis. Even at the height of Madam Walker’s business, “hot combs” and hair straighteners were controversial. Some black leaders (Booker T. Washington among them) denounced them as attempts to imitate whites, but many African American women straightened their hair anyway. Walker herself argued that she had no interest in straightening hair, only in boosting confidence and personal hygiene. Walker’s business dwindled, but the debate over hair continued, carrying important economic as well as social dimensions. In recent years, African Americans spent three times more per person than other consumer groups on hair-care products, cosmetics, toiletries, and other grooming aids. Famous African American singers, actresses, and television personalities, including Oprah Winfrey, relax their hair. Others object. Alice Walker,

 an African American and one of the nation’s foremost authors, calls hair straightening a form of oppression, a “ceiling on the brain” that keeps people from fulfillment. Hip-hop music reinforces the message, taking hair, as one music magazine has said, “back to its African roots. From dreads, cornrows, and braids to twists, coils to ‘fros, hip hop is keeping it real . . . natural. For many, hair is more than just a style—it’s a statement.” Madam Walker would have agreed. Hair care, she believed, involved more than hair; it meant pride, better health, and new opportunities for black women everywhere. When she returned to the Negro Business League convention in 1913, she talked about economic independence for African American women. “The girls and women of our race,” she said, “must not be afraid to take hold of business endeavor . . . wring success out of a number of business opportunities that lie at their very doors. . . . I want to say to every Negro woman present, don’t sit down and wait for the opportunities to come. . . . Get up and make them!”

QUESTIONS FOR DISCUSSION 1.
Why was Madam C.J. Walker’s business so successful? 2. Why did some black people oppose using her products? 3. How did Walker try to empower black women and win more rights for black Americans? 




 CHAPTER 23

FROM ROOSEVELT TO WILSON IN THE AGE OF PROGRESSIVISM

Conclusion: The Fruits of
Progressivism
 The election of 1916 showed how deeply progressivism had reached into American society. “We have in four years,” Wilson said that fall, “come very near to carrying out the platform of the Progressive Party as well as our own; for we are also progressives.” In retrospect, however, 1916 also marked the beginning of progressivism’s decline. At most, the years of progressive reform lasted from the 1890s to 1921, and in large measure they were compressed into a single decade between 1906 and American entry into World War I in 1917. Many problems the progressives addressed but did not solve; and some important ones, such as race, they did not even tackle. Yet their regulatory commissions, direct primaries, city improvements, and child labor laws marked an era of important and measured reform. The institution of the presidency expanded. From the White House radiated executive departments that guided a host of activities. Independent commissions, operating within flexible laws, supplemented executive authority. These developments owed a great deal to both Roosevelt and Wilson. To manage a complex society, Roosevelt developed a simple formula: expert advice; growth-minded policies; a balancing of business, labor, and other interests; the use of publicity to gather support; and stern but often permissive oversight of the economy. Roosevelt strengthened the executive office, and he called on the

 newer group of professional, educated, public-minded citizens to help him. “I believe in a strong executive,” he said; “I believe in power.” At first, Wilson had different ideas, wanting to dismantle much of Roosevelt’s governing apparatus. But driven by outside forces and changes in his own thinking, Wilson soon moved in directions similar to those Roosevelt had championed. Starting out to disperse power, he eventually consolidated it. Through such movements, government at all levels accepted responsibility for the welfare of various elements in the social order. A reform-minded and bureaucratic society took shape, in which men and women, labor and capital, political parties and social classes competed for shares in the expansive framework of twentieth-century life. But there were limits to reform. As both Roosevelt and Wilson found, the new government agencies, understaffed and underfinanced, depended on the responsiveness of those they sought to regulate. Soon there was a far darker cloud on the horizon. The spirit of progressivism rested on a belief in human potential, peace, and progress. After Napoleon’s defeat in 1815, a century of peace began in western Europe, and as the decades passed, war seemed a dying institution. “It looks as though this were going to be the age of treaties rather than the age of wars,” an American said in 1912, “the century of reason rather than the century of force.” It was not to be. Two years later, the most devastating of wars broke out in Europe, and in 1917, Americans were fighting on the battlefields of France.

STUDY RESOURCES



Study
 y Resources Take the Study Plan for Chapter 23 From Roosevelt to Wilson in the Age of Progressivism on MyHistoryLab

TIME LINE 1894
National Municipal League formed to work for reform 




 in cities Galveston, Texas, is first city to try commission form of government Theodore Roosevelt becomes president; Robert M. La Follette elected reform governor of Wisconsin; Doctors reorganize the American Medical Association; Socialist party of America organized Roosevelt sues Northern Securities Company for violation of Antitrust Act; Coal miners in northeastern Pennsylvania strike; Maryland is first state to pass workers’ compensation law; Oregon adopts the initiative and referendum Roosevelt elected president Hepburn Act strengthens Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC); Upton Sinclair attacks meatpacking industry in The Jungle; Congress passes Meat Inspection Act and Pure Food and Drug Act

 1908 Taft elected president; Supreme Court upholds

 Oregon law limiting working hours for women in Muller v. Oregon Payne-Aldrich Tariff Act divides Republican party Mann-Elkins Act passed to regulate railroads; Taft fires Gifford Pinchot, head of U.S. Forest Service; Democrats sweep midterm elections Progressive party formed; nominates Roosevelt for president; Woodrow Wilson elected president Underwood Tariff Act lowers rates; Federal Reserve Act reforms U.S. banking system; Sixteenth Amendment authorizes Congress to collect taxes on incomes Clayton Act strengthens antitrust legislation Wilson wins reelection Supreme Court strikes down federal law limiting child labor in Hammer v. Dagenhart Nineteenth Amendment gives women the right to vote

CHAPTER REVIEW
The Spirit of Progressivism 
The Republican Roosevelt


 What were the six major characteristics of progressivism?

 How would you describe the personality and programs of Theodore Roosevelt?

 Progressivism sought cures for social and economic problems and was defined by six major characteristics: (1) a desire not to harm big business but to humanize and regulate it; (2) optimism about human nature; (3) a willingness to intervene in people’s lives; (4) a tendency to stress the authority of the state and the government; (5) belief in the environment as a key to reform; and (6) a nationwide base. p. 537

 Roosevelt attacked some trusts and, through the courts, broke up a railroad holding company. His intervention in the coal strike of 1902 reflected his active, energetic personality and represented an advance in presidential power. p. 546

Reform in the Cities and States
Roc


Capitol Reef
1937/1971


 n

Arches 1929/1978


 n

Canyonlands 1964
Mesa Verde 1906


 What methods did progressive reformers use to attack problems in the cities and states?

 Progressive reformers turned increasingly to the government to carry out their measures. At the same time, ironically, fewer people tended to vote. Reformers focused on life in the growing cities. Robert M. La Follette of Wisconsin personified the movement. His focus was on improving factory safety, regulating the railroads, and adopting political reforms. p. 544 Grand Canyon 1908/1919

Saguaro
1933/1994


Bryce Canyon
1923/1928


Petrified Forest
1906/1962


Carlsbad Caverns
1923/1930


Roosevelt Progressivism at its Height
 What were the major measures of Theodore Roosevelt’s term from 1905 to 1909? Winning easy election in 1904, Roosevelt persuaded Congress to improve railroad regulation, backed pure food and drug laws, and enlarged national parks. In all these actions, he reflected the values of the progressive generation: a reliance on experts, a faith in government power to initiate reform, and a desire to tame big business. p. 548



 CHAPTER 23

CHAPTER REVIEW

The Ordeal of William Howard Taft


 Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom

 Why was the presidency of William Howard Taft so difficult for him?

 What were the central principles of Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom?

 Roosevelt had left Taft a variety of difficult problems, including the tariff and a widening split between progressive and conservative Republicans. Taft increasingly alienated the progressives and Roosevelt. In the election of 1912, Taft finished third behind Woodrow Wilson and Roosevelt. p. 550

 Victorious in 1912, Wilson set out to put into effect the central principles of his New Freedom program, including tariff reform, an antitrust law, and the Federal Reserve Act, a measure that still guides our economy today. By 1916, however, Wilson found greater value in Roosevelt’s New Nationalism, which had emphasized government intervention and measures to protect women, labor, and other groups. p. 553

KEY TERMS AND DEFINITIONS
Progressive (or “Bull Moose”) Party This political party was formed by Theodore Roosevelt to advance progressive ideas and unseat President William Howard Taft in 1912. p. 537 National American Woman Suffrage Association Founded by Susan B. Anthony in 1890, this organization worked to secure women the right to vote. It stressed careful organization and peaceful lobbying. p. 541 Pragmatism An early twentieth-century doctrine, based n the ideas of William James. Pragmatists were impatient with the concept of truth as an abstract reality. They believed that truth should work for the individual and that people were not only shaped by their environment but also helped to shape it. If an idea worked, it became truth. p. 542 Hepburn Act A 1906 law that strengthened the power of the Interstate Commerce Commission (ICC) to regulate the railroads. p. 548 Conservation President Theodore Roosevelt made this principle one of his administration’s top goals. Conservation in his view aimed at protecting the nation’s natural resources, but called for the wise use of them rather than locking them away. p. 549 
 New Freedom President Woodrow Wilson’s program, which emphasized business competition and small government. It sought to rein in federal authority, release individual energy, and restore competition. It achieved many of the progressive social-justice objectives while pushing for a free economy rather than a planned one. p. 553 Underwood Tariff Act This 1913 law reduced tariff rates and levied a graduated income tax to make up for the lost revenue. p. 554 Federal Reserve Act This 1913 act created a central banking system, consisting of 12 regional banks governed by the Federal Reserve Board. It was an attempt to provide the United States with a sound yet flexible currency. p. 554 Clayton Antitrust Act This law outlawed interlocking directorates (in which the same people served as directors for several competing companies), forbade policies that created monopolies, and made corporate officers responsible for antitrust violations. It also declared that unions were not conspiracies in restraint of trade and outlawed the use of injunctions in labor disputes unless they were necessary to protect property. p. 554

 New Nationalism President Theodore Roosevelt’s program calling for a national approach to the country’s affairs and a strong president to deal with them; efficiency in government and society; and protection of children, women, and workers. It accepted “good” trusts; and exalted the expert and the executive. It also encouraged large concentrations of capital and labor. p. 553

CRITICAL THINKING QUESTIONS 1.
How might American history have changed if the Progressive Era had not occurred? 
 2. How did the major measures of Roosevelt’s second term continue the progressive approaches on his first term?

 3. How did the differences of opinion during the Progressive Era affect the Taft administration?

 4. How did the Wilson administration draw on the characteristics of the Progressive Era?

STUDY RESOURCES

 MyHistoryLab Media Assignments Find these resources in the Media Assignments folder for Chapter 23 on MyHistoryLab Roosevelt Progressivism at its Height

The Spirit of Progressivism
Read the Document
 of the Cities p. 538

◾
◾


Read the Document
(1906) p. 548


 Lincoln Steffens, from The Shame

Read the Document
(1915) p. 540


Report of the Vice Commission


View the Map Changing Lives of American Women,
1880–1930 p. 541
Read the Document National Woman Suffrage
 Association, Mother’s Day Letter p. 542 Read the Document Eugene V. Debs, from “The Outlook for Socialism in America” p. 543

 Upton Sinclair, from The Jungle

The Ordeal of William Howard Taft
◾


Watch the Video
Speech p. 552


◾


 Read the Document Woodrow Wilson, from The New Feedom p. 553

Bull Moose Campaign


 Woodrow Wilson’s New Freedom ◾

Complete the Assignment Madam C. J. Walker:
African American Business Pioneer p. 556


The Republican Roosevelt
 Read the Document Theodore Roosevelt, from The Strenuous Life (1900) p. 546

◾ Indicates Study Plan Media Assignment






The Nation at War


Contents and Learning Objectives
A NEW WORLD POWER PG. 564

OVER HERE PG. 577

 What were the main events that showed the United States was becoming a world power?

 What programs and changes did World War I bring at home?

FOREIGN POLICY UNDER WILSON PG. 566

 What mistakes did Wilson make in negotiating the Treaty of Versailles?

 What did Woodrow Wilson mean by “moral diplomacy”?

TOWARD WAR PG. 568

THE TREATY OF VERSAILLES PG. 582

FEATURE ESSAY
Measuring the Mind 
 What were the reasons behind and dangers of Wilson’s neutrality policy?

OVER THERE PG. 572
How did the United States’ entry affect the course of World War I? 
 Listen to the Audio File on myhistorylab

